Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,149
Vehicle entering roadway from private road or driveway; yield right-of-way.

The driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, driveway, private road, or building shall stop such vehicle immediately before driving onto a sidewalk and shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian approaching on any sidewalk. Before entering the highway, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on such highway.

The driver of a vehicle entering an alley, building, private road, or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian approaching on any sidewalk.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-638;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 245.

The statute requiring a driver of a vehicle emerging from a driveway onto a highway to yield the right-of-way to vehicles approaching on such highway applies to a 15-year-old boy riding a bicycle. McFarland v. King, 216 Neb. 92, 341 N.W.2d 920 (1983).

Jury damage award to defendant on counterclaim, in auto negligence case, reversed where defendant held negligent as matter of law. Rief v. Foy, 198 Neb. 572, 254 N.W.2d 86 (1977).

An automobile driver is required to see only those approaching vehicles which relative to speed and distance are within the radius which denotes the limit of danger. Laux v. Robinson, 195 Neb. 601, 239 N.W.2d 786 (1976).

A bicyclist "emerging from an alley, driveway, private road, or building" shall stop before entering a highway or road. Luellman v. Ambroz, 2 Neb. App. 855, 516 N.W.2d 627 (1994).